Missouri, session 2026, SB1404.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 171, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 171.216, to read as
follows:
171.216. 1. Each school district and charter school
that currently uses, has used within the past twelve months,
or in the future intends to use a tutoring program or
service with at least a fifty percent ownership interest
held outside the United States shall notify the parent of
each student enrolled in such school district or charter
school.
2. Such notice shall contain:
(1) The name of the tutoring program or service;
(2) A disclosure of the owner holding a majority
ownership interest in such tutoring program or service; and
(3) Whether such owner is designated as a foreign
adversary of the United States pursuant to 15 CFR 791.4 as
of the first day of the school year in which the notice is
sent to such parent.
✓